sk-SK: Motocyklová disciplína: Adventure/turistické; Viacúčelové; Dual-sport; Enduro; Motokáry/iné motoristické športy; Motokros (MX); Terénne/trail; Cestné/mestské; Okruhové/pretekárske; Iné
lt-LT: Motociklo važiavimo disciplina: Nuotykiai / turizmas; Universalus; Dvejopos paskirties („Dual-sport“); Enduro; Kartingai / kitas motosportas; Motokrosas (MX); Bekelė / trasos; Gatvė / miestas; Trekas / lenktynės; Kita
bg-BG: Дисциплина на каране с мотоциклет: Адвенчър/туринг; Универсален; Дуал-спорт; Ендуро; Картинг/друг мотоспорт; Мотокрос (MX); Офроуд/пресечен терен; Шосейно/градско; Писта/състезания; Друго
nl: Motorfiets rijdiscipline: Adventure/Touring; Allround; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting/andere motorsport; Motocross (MX); Offroad/Trail; Straat/Stedelijk; Circuit/Racing; Overig
nb: Motorsykkelkjøringsdisiplin: Adventure/touring; Flerbruks; Dual-sport; Enduro; Gokart / annen motorsport; Motocross (MX); Terreng/sti; Gate/urban; Bane/racing; Annet
hr-HR: Disciplina vožnje motocikla: Avanturistička vožnja / touring; Višenamjensko; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting / ostali motosportovi; Motokros (MX); Off-road / trail; Cestovna / urbana vožnja; Staza / utrke; Ostalo
es: Tipo de conducción de motocicletas: Aventura/turismo; Multiuso; Doble propósito; Enduro; Karting/otros deportes de motor; Motocross (MX); Todoterreno/trail; Calle/urbano; Pista/carreras; Otro
cs: Disciplína v jízdě na motocyklu: Adventure / touring; Univerzální; Dual-sport; Enduro; Motokáry / jiný motosport; Motokros (MX); Off-road / traily; Do města / na ulici; Na okruh / závodní; Jiné
pt-PT: disciplina de condução de motociclos: Aventura/turismo; Todo o tipo de usos; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting/outro desporto motorizado; Motocross (MX); Todo o terreno/trail; Rua/urbano; Pista/corridas; Outro
pt-BR: Motocicleta disciplina de pilotagem: Aventura/turismo; Multiuso; Uso misto; Enduro; Kart/outro esporte a motor; Motocross (MX); Off-road/trilha; Rua/urbano; Pista/corrida; Outros
zh-CN: 摩托车骑行领域: 探险/旅行; 通用; 全地形; 耐力赛; 卡丁车/其他赛车运动; 越野摩托车 (MX); 越野/林道; 街道/城市; 赛道/赛车; 其他
vi: Kỷ luật lái xe mô tô: Đa địa hình/Đường trường; Đa năng; Thể thao kép; Enduro; Đua xe kart/môn thể thao mô-tô khác; Mô-tô địa hình (MX); Chạy xe địa hình/Đường mòn; Đường phố/Đô thị; Đường đua/Đua xe; Khác
ro-RO: Disciplina la condusul motocicletei: Aventură/Turism; Universal; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting/alte sporturi cu motor; Motocross (MX); Off-road/Trail; Stradă/Urban; Pistă/Curse; Altele
ko: 오토바이 주행 종목: 어드벤처/투어링; 다목적; 듀얼 스포츠; 엔듀로; 카트/기타 모터스포츠; 모터크로스(MX); 오프로드/트레일; 스트리트/도심용; 트랙/레이싱; 기타
sl-SI: Kategorija vožnje z motornim kolesom: Pustolovsko/turno; Večnamensko; Dvonamensko (dual-sport); Enduro; Karting / drugi motošporti; Motokros (MX); Terensko / trail; Cestno / mestno; Dirkališče / dirkanje; Drugo
ru: Дисциплина мотоезды: Турэндуро / туризм; Универсальный; Двойного назначения; Эндуро; Картинг / другой автоспорт; Мотокросс (MX); Внедорожный / трейл; Стрит / городской; Трек / гонки; Другое
pl: Dyscyplina jazdy motocyklem: Adventure / turystyka; Uniwersalny; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting / inne sporty motorowe; Motocross (MX); Terenowy / trail; Uliczny / miejski; Tor / wyścigi; Inne
en: Motorcycle riding discipline: Adventure/Touring; All-purpose; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting/other motorsport; Motocross (MX); Off-road/Trail; Street/Urban; Track/Racing; Other
ja: オートバイのライディング規律: アドベンチャー/ツーリング; 多目的; デュアルスポーツ; エンデューロ; カート/その他モータースポーツ; モトクロス (MX); オフロード/トレイル; ストリート/アーバン; トラック/レーシング; その他
it: Disciplina di guida motociclistica: Adventure/Touring; Multiuso; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting/altri sport motoristici; Motocross (MX); Fuoristrada/Trail; Strada/Urbano; Pista/Racing; Altro
fi: Moottoripyöräilyn ajotyyli: Seikkailu/matka-ajo; Monikäyttö; Dual-sport; Enduro; Karting / muu moottoriurheilu; Motocross (MX); Maasto/polku; Katu/kaupunki; Rata/kilpa-ajo; Muu
fr: Discipline de pratique moto: Aventure/Touring; Polyvalent; Double usage; Enduro; Karting/autre sport mécanique; Motocross (MX); Hors route/Trail; Route/Urbain; Circuit/Course; Autre
da: Kørselsdisciplin for motorcykel: Adventure/touring; Allround; Dual-sport; Enduro; Gokart/anden motorsport; Motocross (MX); Offroad/trail; Gade/by; Bane/racer; Andet
zh-TW: 機車騎乘項目: 探險/巡迴旅行; 多用途; 雙重運動; 耐力賽; 卡丁車/其他賽車運動; 摩托車越野賽 (MX); 越野/林道; 街道/市區; 賽道/賽事; 其他
th: วินัยการขับขี่รถจักรยานยนต์: แอดเวนเจอร์/ทัวร์ริ่ง; อเนกประสงค์; ดูอัลสปอร์ต; เอ็นดูโร่; คาร์ท/มอเตอร์สปอร์ตอื่นๆ; โมโตครอส (MX); ออฟโรด/เทรล; สตรีท/ในเมือง; สนามแข่ง/เรซซิ่ง; อื่นๆ
el: Κατηγορία οδήγησης μοτοσικλέτας: Adventure/Touring; Για κάθε χρήση; Dual-sport; Enduro; Καρτ/άλλος μηχανοκίνητος αθλητισμός; Motocross (MX); Εκτός δρόμου/Trail; Δρόμου/Αστική; Πίστας/Αγωνιστική; Άλλο
hu: Motorkerékpár rendeltetésszerű vezetési környezete: Túra/Enduró (Adventure); Univerzális; Kettős célú (Dual-sport); Enduró; Gokart/egyéb autósport; Motokrossz (MX); Terep/Krossz; Utcai/Városi; Pálya/Verseny; Egyéb
sv: Disciplin för motorcykelkörning: Äventyr/touring; Allround; Dual-sport; Enduro; Gokart/övrig motorsport; Motocross (MX); Terräng/trail; Gata/stad; Bana/tävling; Övrigt
de: Motorradfahrdisziplin: Adventure/Touring; Allzweck; Dual-Sport; Enduro; Karting/anderer Motorsport; Motocross (MX); Offroad/Trail; Street/Urban; Rennstrecke/Rennsport; Sonstige
tr: Motosiklet sürüş disiplini: Macera/Touring; Çok amaçlı; Çift amaçlı; Enduro; Karting/diğer motor sporları; Motokros (MX); Arazi/Patika; Sokak/Şehir içi; Pist/Yarış; Diğer